tools/nl/assets/index_nl.aff
# FLAG FOR FIRST WORDS THAT CAN BE FIRST PART OF COMPOUND AND HAVE AN S WHEN COMPOUNDED
# (unfortunately, I haven't found a method to suppress the affix s at the compound end
#  also, there is no method as far as I know to make affixes specific for a compound flag)

# accept an optional  - when compounding, first part
# the second line allows for the optional hyphen
SFX CA Y 2
SFX CA 0 /CaCp
SFX CA 0 -/CaCp

# accept an optional - when compounding, middle part
# the second line allows for the optional hyphen
SFX CB Y 2
SFX CB 0 /CbCp
SFX CB 0 -/CbCp

# for words that have a plural s and an s when compounding
# the second one allows for the optional hyphen
SFX Cd Y 2
SFX Cd 0 s/CaCbCcCp .
SFX Cd 0 s-/CaCbCcCp .

# for reasons of good results, parts that could have a compounding s
# but no plural s
# have to have separate (!) entries in the dictionary
# using the Ch flag
SFX Ch Y 2
SFX Ch 0 s/CaCbCxCp .
SFX Ch 0 s-/CaCbCcCp .

# FLAG FOR WORDS THAT CAN BE FIRST PART AND COULD HAVE A HYPHEN BECAUSE OF SONANT COLLISIONS (END WITH A, E, I, O, U)
SFX Ce Y 2
SFX Ce 0 /CaCbCp .
SFX Ce 0 -/CaCbCcCp .

# FLAGS FOR LETTERWORDS AND WORD THAT NEED A HYPHEN WHEN COMPOUNDING
SFX Cl Y 1
SFX Cl 0 -/CaCbCp .

PFX Cw Y 1
PFX Cw 0 -/CbCcCp .

# FLAGS FOR NOUN DIMINITIVES
# tuin=>tuintje
SFX Ya Y 3
SFX Ya 0 tje .				
SFX Ya 0 tjes/CaCbCp .			
SFX Ya 0 tjes-/CaCbCp .			

# huis=>huisje
SFX Yb Y 6
SFX Yb 0 je [^m]			
SFX Yb 0 jes/CaCbCp [^m] 		
SFX Yb 0 jes-/CaCbCp [^m] 		
SFX Yb 0 pje [m]			
SFX Yb 0 pjes/CaCbCp [m]		
SFX Yb 0 pjes-/CaCbCp [m]		

# opleiding=>opleidinkje
SFX Yc Y 3
SFX Yc g kje .				
SFX Yc g kjes/CaCbCp .			
SFX Yc g kjes-/CaCbCp .			

# ding=>dingetje
SFX Yd Y 3
SFX Yd 0 etje .				
SFX Yd 0 etjes/CaCbCp .			
SFX Yd 0 etjes-/CaCbCp .		

# auto=>autootje
SFX Ye Y 15
SFX Ye 0 atje a				
SFX Ye 0 utje u				
SFX Ye 0 otje o				
SFX Ye 0 etje i				
SFX Ye é eetje é			
SFX Ye 0 atjes/CaCbCp a			
SFX Ye 0 atjes-/CaCbCp a		
SFX Ye 0 utjes/CaCbCp u			
SFX Ye 0 utjes-/CaCbCp u		
SFX Ye 0 otjes/CaCbCp o			
SFX Ye 0 otjes-/CaCbCp o		
SFX Ye 0 etjes/CaCbCp i			
SFX Ye 0 etjes-/CaCbCp i		
SFX Ye é eetjes/CaCbCp é		
SFX Ye é eetjes-/CaCbCp é		

# bal=>balletje
SFX Yf Y 27
SFX Yf 0 betje b			
SFX Yf 0 getje g			
SFX Yf 0 ketje k			
SFX Yf 0 letje l			
SFX Yf 0 metje m			
SFX Yf 0 netje n			
SFX Yf 0 petje p			
SFX Yf 0 retje r			
SFX Yf 0 setje s			
SFX Yf 0 betjes/CaCbCp b		
SFX Yf 0 getjes/CaCbCp g		
SFX Yf 0 ketjes/CaCbCp k		
SFX Yf 0 letjes/CaCbCp l		
SFX Yf 0 metjes/CaCbCp m		
SFX Yf 0 netjes/CaCbCp n		
SFX Yf 0 petjes/CaCbCp p		
SFX Yf 0 retjes/CaCbCp r		
SFX Yf 0 setjes/CaCbCp s		
SFX Yf 0 betjes-/CaCbCp b		
SFX Yf 0 getjes-/CaCbCp g		
SFX Yf 0 ketjes-/CaCbCp k		
SFX Yf 0 letjes-/CaCbCp l		
SFX Yf 0 metjes-/CaCbCp m		
SFX Yf 0 netjes-/CaCbCp n		
SFX Yf 0 petjes-/CaCbCp p		
SFX Yf 0 retjes-/CaCbCp r		
SFX Yf 0 setjes-/CaCbCp s		

# AOW=>AOW'tje
SFX Yg Y 2
SFX Yg 0 'tje .				
SFX Yg 0 'tjes .			

# FLAGS FOR PLURALS (COMPOUNDING END)
# team=>teams
SFX Za Y 1
SFX Za 0 s .				

# ium => iums, ia, icus->ici
SFX Zu Y 4
SFX Zu 0 s ium
SFX Zu ium ia ium			
SFX Zu icus ici icus			
SFX Zu icus ica icus			

# tuin=>tuinen
SFX Zb Y 1
SFX Zb 0 en

# auto=>auto's, cd => cd's
SFX Zc Y 1
SFX Zc 0 's .				

# schoonheid=>schoonheden
SFX Zd Y 2
SFX Zd heid heden/CaCbCp .		
SFX Zd heid heden-/CaCbCp .		

# tas=>tassen
SFX Ze Y 24
SFX Ze 0 ben/CaCbCp b		
SFX Ze 0 den/CaCbCp d		
SFX Ze 0 fen/CaCbCp f		
SFX Ze 0 gen/CaCbCp g		
SFX Ze 0 ken/CaCbCp k		
SFX Ze 0 len/CaCbCp l		
SFX Ze 0 men/CaCbCp m		
SFX Ze 0 nen/CaCbCp n		
SFX Ze 0 pen/CaCbCp p		
SFX Ze 0 sen/CaCbCp s		
SFX Ze 0 ren/CaCbCp r		
SFX Ze 0 ten/CaCbCp t		
SFX Ze 0 ben-/CaCbCp b		
SFX Ze 0 den-/CaCbCp d		
SFX Ze 0 fen-/CaCbCp f		
SFX Ze 0 gen-/CaCbCp g		
SFX Ze 0 ken-/CaCbCp k		
SFX Ze 0 len-/CaCbCp l		
SFX Ze 0 men-/CaCbCp m		
SFX Ze 0 nen-/CaCbCp n		
SFX Ze 0 pen-/CaCbCp p		
SFX Ze 0 sen-/CaCbCp s		
SFX Ze 0 ren-/CaCbCp r		
SFX Ze 0 ten-/CaCbCp t		

# baal=>balen
SFX Zf Y 88
SFX Zf al len/CaCbCp l		
SFX Zf ar ren/CaCbCp r		
SFX Zf an nen/CaCbCp n		
SFX Zf ad den/CaCbCp d		
SFX Zf ak ken/CaCbCp k		
SFX Zf ap pen/CaCbCp p		
SFX Zf as zen/CaCbCp s		
SFX Zf af ven/CaCbCp f		
SFX Zf am men/CaCbCp m		
SFX Zf at ten/CaCbCp t		
SFX Zf ag gen/CaCbCp g		
SFX Zf el len/CaCbCp l		
SFX Zf er ren/CaCbCp r		
SFX Zf en nen/CaCbCp n		
SFX Zf ed den/CaCbCp d		
SFX Zf ek ken/CaCbCp k		
SFX Zf ep pen/CaCbCp p		
SFX Zf es zen/CaCbCp s		
SFX Zf ef ven/CaCbCp f		
SFX Zf em men/CaCbCp m		
SFX Zf et ten/CaCbCp t		
SFX Zf eg gen/CaCbCp g		
SFX Zf ol len/CaCbCp l		
SFX Zf or ren/CaCbCp r		
SFX Zf on nen/CaCbCp n		
SFX Zf od den/CaCbCp d		
SFX Zf ok ken/CaCbCp k		
SFX Zf op pen/CaCbCp p		
SFX Zf os zen/CaCbCp s		
SFX Zf of ven/CaCbCp f		
SFX Zf om men/CaCbCp m		
SFX Zf ot ten/CaCbCp t		
SFX Zf og gen/CaCbCp g		
SFX Zf ul len/CaCbCp l		
SFX Zf ur ren/CaCbCp r		
SFX Zf un nen/CaCbCp n		
SFX Zf ud den/CaCbCp d		
SFX Zf uk ken/CaCbCp k		
SFX Zf up pen/CaCbCp p		
SFX Zf us zen/CaCbCp s		
SFX Zf uf ven/CaCbCp f		
SFX Zf um men/CaCbCp m		
SFX Zf ut ten/CaCbCp t		
SFX Zf ug gen/CaCbCp g		
SFX Zf al len-/CaCbCd l		
SFX Zf ar ren-/CaCbCp r		
SFX Zf an nen-/CaCbCp n		
SFX Zf ad den-/CaCbCp d		
SFX Zf ak ken-/CaCbCp k		
SFX Zf ap pen-/CaCbCp p		
SFX Zf as zen-/CaCbCp s		
SFX Zf af ven-/CaCbCp f		
SFX Zf am men-/CaCbCp m		
SFX Zf at ten-/CaCbCp t		
SFX Zf ag gen-/CaCbCp g		
SFX Zf el len-/CaCbCp l		
SFX Zf er ren-/CaCbCp r		
SFX Zf en nen-/CaCbCp n		
SFX Zf ed den-/CaCbCp d		
SFX Zf ek ken-/CaCbCp k		
SFX Zf ep pen-/CaCbCp p		
SFX Zf es zen-/CaCbCp s		
SFX Zf ef ven-/CaCbCp f		
SFX Zf em men-/CaCbCp m		
SFX Zf et ten-/CaCbCp t		
SFX Zf eg gen-/CaCbCp g		
SFX Zf ol len-/CaCbCp l		
SFX Zf or ren-/CaCbCp r		
SFX Zf on nen-/CaCbCp n		
SFX Zf od den-/CaCbCp d		
SFX Zf ok ken-/CaCbCp k		
SFX Zf op pen-/CaCbCp p		
SFX Zf os zen-/CaCbCp s		
SFX Zf of ven-/CaCbCp f		
SFX Zf om men-/CaCbCp m		
SFX Zf ot ten-/CaCbCp t		
SFX Zf og gen-/CaCbCp g		
SFX Zf ul len-/CaCbCp l		
SFX Zf ur ren-/CaCbCp r		
SFX Zf un nen-/CaCbCp n		
SFX Zf ud den-/CaCbCp d		
SFX Zf uk ken-/CaCbCp k		
SFX Zf up pen-/CaCbCp p		
SFX Zf us zen-/CaCbCp s		
SFX Zf uf ven-/CaCbCp f		
SFX Zf um men-/CaCbCp m		
SFX Zf ut ten-/CaCbCp t		
SFX Zf ug gen-/CaCbCp g		

# paragraaf => paragrafen
SFX Zg Y 2
SFX Zg af fen/CaCbCp .		
SFX Zg af fen-/CaCbCp .		

#lens=>lenzen
SFX Zh Y 4
SFX Zh s zen/CaCbCp s		
SFX Zh f ven/CaCbCp f		
SFX Zh s zen-/CaCbCp s		
SFX Zh f ven-/CaCbCp f		

# legende=>legenden (non-compounding)
SFX Zi Y 1
SFX Zi 0 n .		

# dode=>doden (compounding)
SFX Zj Y 2
SFX Zj 0 n/CaCbCp .		
SFX Zj 0 n-/CaCbCp .		

# FLAGS FOR VERBS

# flags for more or less common prefixes in verbs
PFX Pa Y 1
PFX Pa 0 aaneen .
PFX Pb Y 1
PFX Pb 0 aan .
PFX Pc Y 1
PFX Pc 0 achtereen .
PFX Pd Y 1
PFX Pd 0 achter .
PFX Pe Y 1
PFX Pe 0 achterna .
PFX Pf Y 1
PFX Pf 0 achterop .
PFX Pg Y 1
PFX Pg 0 achterover .
PFX Ph Y 1
PFX Ph 0 achteruit .
PFX Pi Y 1
PFX Pi 0 achterom .
PFX Pj Y 1
PFX Pj 0 af .
PFX Pk Y 1
PFX Pk 0 uiteen .
PFX Pl Y 1
PFX Pl 0 bĳ .
PFX Pm Y 1
PFX Pm 0 over .
PFX Pn Y 1
PFX Pn 0 voor .
PFX Po Y 1
PFX Po 0 binnen .
PFX Pp Y 1
PFX Pp 0 door .
PFX Pq Y 1
PFX Pq 0 dicht .
PFX Pr Y 1
PFX Pr 0 mee .
PFX Ps Y 1
PFX Ps 0 uit .
PFX Pt Y 1
PFX Pt 0 na .


# 3d person, add a t to the stem
SFX V3 Y 1
SFX V3 0 t .		

# past tense, add de or den to the stem
SFX Vp Y 2
SFX Vp 0 de .		
SFX Vp 0 den .		

# past tense, add te or ten to the stem
SFX Vq Y 2
SFX Vq 0 te .		
SFX Vq 0 ten .		

# verb +d, +de
SFX Vi Y 2
SFX Vi 0 d .		
SFX Vi 0 de .		

# aangetekend => aangetekende
SFX Ve Y 1
SFX Ve 0 e .		

# FLAGS FOR ADJECTIVES
# viezig => viezige, moe => moeë
SFX Aa Y 2
SFX Aa 0 e [^e]		
SFX Aa 0 ë [e]		

# lelijk => lelijker, raar => raarder
SFX Ab Y 2
SFX Ab 0 er [^r]	
SFX Ab 0 der r		

# lelijk => lelijkere, dor => dordere
SFX Ac Y 2
SFX Ac 0 ere [^r]	
SFX Ac 0 dere r		

# lelijk => lelijkst
SFX Ad Y 2
SFX Ad 0 st/A0 [^s]	
SFX Ad 0 t/A0 [s]		

# lelijkst => allerlijkst
PFX A0 Y 1
PFX A0 0 aller

# lelijk => lelijkste
SFX Ae Y 2
SFX Ae 0 ste/A0 [^s]	
SFX Ae 0 te/A0 [s]		

# lelijk => lelijks
SFX Ai Y 1
SFX Ai 0 s .		

# baar => bare, boos=> boze
SFX Al Y 29
SFX Al ob be oob	
SFX Al ad de aad	
SFX Al ed de eed	
SFX Al od de ood	
SFX Al af ve aaf	
SFX Al of ve oof	
SFX Al ag ge aag	
SFX Al eg ge eeg	
SFX Al og ge oog	
SFX Al ak ke aak	
SFX Al ek ke eek	
SFX Al ok ke ook	
SFX Al al le aal	
SFX Al el le eel	
SFX Al ol le ool	
SFX Al am me aam	
SFX Al om me oom	
SFX Al um me uum	
SFX Al an ne aan	
SFX Al en ne een	
SFX Al on ne oon	
SFX Al ar re aar	
SFX Al or re oor	
SFX Al es se ees	
SFX Al at te aat	
SFX Al et te eet	
SFX Al ot te oot	
SFX Al os ze oos	
SFX Al us se uus	


# industrieel => industriële
SFX Am Y 1
SFX Am eel ële ieel	

# zwak => zwakke
SFX An Y 11
SFX An 0 de d	
SFX An 0 fe f	
SFX An 0 ge g	
SFX An 0 ke k	
SFX An 0 le l	
SFX An 0 me m	
SFX An 0 ne n	
SFX An 0 pe p	
SFX An 0 re r	
SFX An 0 se s	
SFX An 0 te t	

# zwak => zwakker
SFX Ao Y 11
SFX Ao 0 der d		
SFX Ao 0 fer f		
SFX Ao 0 ger g		
SFX Ao 0 ker k		
SFX Ao 0 ler l		
SFX Ao 0 mer m		
SFX Ao 0 ner n		
SFX Ao 0 per p		
SFX Ao 0 rer r		
SFX Ao 0 ser s		
SFX Ao 0 ter t		

# zwak => zwakkere
SFX Ap Y 11
SFX Ap 0 dere d		
SFX Ap 0 fere f		
SFX Ap 0 gere g		
SFX Ap 0 kere k		
SFX Ap 0 lere l		
SFX Ap 0 mere m		
SFX Ap 0 nere n		
SFX Ap 0 pere p		
SFX Ap 0 rere r		
SFX Ap 0 sere s		
SFX Ap 0 tere t		

# kaad => kwader, boos=> bozer
SFX Aq Y 27
SFX Aq ob ber oob	
SFX Aq ad der aad	
SFX Aq ed der eed	
SFX Aq od der ood	
SFX Aq af ver aaf	
SFX Aq of ver oof	
SFX Aq ag ger aag	
SFX Aq eg ger eeg	
SFX Aq og ger oog	
SFX Aq ak ker aak	
SFX Aq ek ker eek	
SFX Aq ok ker ook	
SFX Aq al ler aal	
SFX Aq el ler eel	
SFX Aq ol ler ool	
SFX Aq am mer aam	
SFX Aq om mer oom	
SFX Aq um mer uum	
SFX Aq an ner aan	
SFX Aq en ner een	
SFX Aq on ner oon	
SFX Aq es ser ees	
SFX Aq at ter aat	
SFX Aq et ter eet	
SFX Aq ot ter oot	
SFX Aq os zer oos	
SFX Aq us ser uus	

# lief => lieve, precicieus => precisieuze
SFX Ar Y 2
SFX Ar f ve f	
SFX Ar s ze s	

# lief => liever
SFX As Y 2
SFX As f ver f	
SFX As s zer s	

# kaad => kwaders, boos=> bozers
SFX At Y 27
SFX At ob bers oob	
SFX At ad ders aad	
SFX At ed ders eed	
SFX At od ders ood	
SFX At af vers aaf	
SFX At of vers oof	
SFX At ag gers aag	
SFX At eg gers eeg	
SFX At og gers oog	
SFX At ak kers aak	
SFX At ek kers eek	
SFX At ok kers ook	
SFX At al lers aal	
SFX At el lers eel	
SFX At ol lers ool	
SFX At am mers aam	
SFX At om mers oom	
SFX At um mers uum	
SFX At an ners aan	
SFX At en ners een	
SFX At on ners oon	
SFX At es sers ees	
SFX At at ters aat	
SFX At et ters eet	
SFX At ot ters oot	
SFX At os zers oos	
SFX At us sers uus	

# lief => lievers
SFX Au Y 2
SFX Au f vers f	
SFX Au s zers s	

# zwak => zwakkers
SFX Av Y 11
SFX Av 0 ders d	
SFX Av 0 fers f	
SFX Av 0 gers g	
SFX Av 0 kers k	
SFX Av 0 lers l	
SFX Av 0 mers m	
SFX Av 0 ners n	
SFX Av 0 pers p	
SFX Av 0 rers r	
SFX Av 0 sers s	
SFX Av 0 ters t	

# lelijk => lelijkers, raar => raarders
SFX Aw Y 2
SFX Aw 0 ers [^r]	
SFX Aw 0 ders r	

# kaad => kwadere, boos=> bozere
SFX Ax Y 27
SFX Ax ob bere oob	
SFX Ax ad dere aad	
SFX Ax ed dere eed	
SFX Ax od dere ood	
SFX Ax af vere aaf	
SFX Ax of vere oof	
SFX Ax ag gere aag	
SFX Ax eg gere eeg	
SFX Ax og gere oog	
SFX Ax ak kere aak	
SFX Ax ek kere eek	
SFX Ax ok kere ook	
SFX Ax al lere aal	
SFX Ax el lere eel	
SFX Ax ol lere ool	
SFX Ax am mere aam	
SFX Ax om mere oom	
SFX Ax um mere uum	
SFX Ax an nere aan	
SFX Ax en nere een	
SFX Ax on nere oon	
SFX Ax es sere ees	
SFX Ax at tere aat	
SFX Ax et tere eet	
SFX Ax ot tere oot	
SFX Ax os zere oos	
SFX Ax us sere uus	
